Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-401
Hunting, fishing, or fur-harvesting permit; required, when; exemptions; violation; penalty.

For the purpose of supplying revenue for the propagation, importation, distribution, protection, and conservation of the wildlife of this state, including all wild animals, birds, fish, and all things pertaining thereto, every person sixteen years of age or older who hunts for game animals or game birds or takes bullfrogs or any other species defined as game or who takes fish and every person sixteen years of age or older who engages in fur harvesting shall first pay a fee established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327 and obtain a permit except persons exempt from this requirement pursuant to section 37-402. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor and shall be fined at least forty dollars.

Laws 1929, c. 112, II, § 1, p. 409;

C.S.1929, § 37-201;

Laws 1937, c. 89, § 2, p. 291;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-201;

R.S.1943, § 37-201;

Laws 1957, c. 140, § 1, p. 475;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 3, p. 465;

Laws 1959, c. 149, § 1, p. 565;

Laws 1961, c. 169, § 1, p. 501;

Laws 1961, c. 170, § 1, p. 509;

Laws 1963, c. 201, § 1, p. 650;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 2, p. 579;

Laws 1973, LB 331, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 195, § 2;

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 170, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 105, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 259, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-201;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 111.